Massachusetts, session 194th, S3042.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other 
general or special law to the contrary, and in order to promote the public good, the state board of 
retirement shall credit Joseph D. Ryan of the city of Taunton police department with creditable 
service for the period of August 4, 2003 to January 6, 2008 in which time he was a police officer 
for the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for the purpose of determining his 
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of subdivision 
(2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. Eligibility for this creditable service shall be 
conditioned upon payment by Joseph D. Ryan of the city of Taunton police department into the 
state employees’ retirement system in an amount equal to the amount that would have been 
deducted under said chapter 32 if he had received regular compensation during this period at an 
annual rate equal to the annual rate of regular compensation that he was receiving immediately 

of 2 12 before this period together with regular interest thereon. Such repayment shall be made in 1 sum 
or installments as the state retirement board shall prescribe. 
SECTION 2. Upon Joseph D. Ryan’s retirement pursuant to sections 5, 6 or 7 of chapter 
32, or pursuant to any special act, or in the event of Joseph D. Ryan’s death prior to his 
retirement, the state board of retirement upon request shall transfer the funds it received from 
Joseph D. Ryan pursuant to this Act, together with accrued interest, to the Massachusetts 
Contributory Retirement System of which he is a member at the time of his retirement or death, 
and the state board of retirement shall accept liability pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision (8) 
of section 3 of chapter 32 for five (5) years and five (5) months of creditable service rendered 
during the period of August 4, 2003 to January 6, 2008. 
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the transfer required in Section 2, the state board of 
retirement shall not bear any liability pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision (8) of section 3 of 
chapter 32 for the aforementioned transfer and creditable service if Joseph D. Ryan retires for 
accidental disability, or his surviving spouse or dependents are awarded accidental death or line 
of duty death benefits pursuant to sections 9 or 100 of chapter 32, respectively.  
SECTION 4. This act shall be effective upon its passage.